California statutes. Public Resources Code
The three-fourths interests referred to in Sections 3642, 3649, and 3651 shall be determined as follows:

(a) A total value, composed of the combined value of all of the primary tract assignment and secondary tract assignment, shall be assigned to all of the tracts of land which are the subject of the unit agreement or the proposed unit agreement.

(b) The pro rata interest of each working interest owner shall be equal to a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the total value of the primary tract assignment and secondary tract assignment of the tract or tracts in which he has a working interest, in accordance with his fractional share of such interest, if any, and the denominator of which shall be the value determined under subdivision (a).

(c) The pro rata interest of each royalty interest owner shall be equal to a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the total value of the primary tract assignment and secondary tract assignment of the tract or tracts in which he has a royalty interest, in accordance with his fractional share of such interest, if any, and the denominator of which shall be the value determined under subdivision (a).

If there are no royalties outstanding with respect to a tract or tracts of land included within or proposed to be included within a unit area, then for the purpose of determining the three-fourths of royalty interests the working interest owners in any such tract of land shall be deemed to be the owners of a royalty with respect to such tract in the same proportion as their ownership of the working interest therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3656.

No unit agreement approved by the supervisor pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall effect or result in, or be construed to effect or result in, the alienation, transfer, or change of any title or ownership, legal or equitable, of any person or party in or to any tract of land or the mineral rights therein to any other person or party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3657.

Operations incident to the drilling, producing, or operating of a well or wells on any portion of a unit area under a unit agreement approved by the supervisor pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed, for the purposes of determining compliance with lease and other contractual obligations, the conduct of such operations on each separately owned tract in the unit area by the several working interest owners thereof. That portion of the production allocated to each tract of land included in the unit area, when produced, shall be deemed for all purposes to have been produced from such tract by a well or wells drilled therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3658.

Any order of the supervisor issued pursuant to this article shall, from and after its effective date, be effective as to, and be binding upon, each person owning an interest in the unit area covered thereby, or in the oil and gas produced therefrom, or the proceeds thereof. Each such person shall have the right to enforce the provisions of the unit agreement, including, but not limited to, the provisions for determining rates of production, whether or not such person expressly consented to the unit agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3659.

Prior to any public hearing held by the supervisor pursuant to this chapter, the supervisor shall give reasonable written notice of the hearing to all persons shown by the records of the tax assessor to have an interest in the land proposed for unit operation, and shall give written notice to any city within which the land lies and, with respect to land which lies in an unincorporated area, to the county in which the land lies. Such city or county or any other interested person may, on any matter relevant to the proposed agreement for operation, submit testimony and evidence for the consideration of the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liens [3680. - 3681.]

3680.

A person to whom another is indebted for expenses incurred in carrying on unit operations may, in order to secure payment of the amount due, fix a lien upon the interest of the debtor in the unit production as and when produced from the unit area by filing for record with the recorder of the county where the property or a portion thereof involved is located, an affidavit setting forth all of the following:

(a) In general terms the kind of materials, tools, equipment, or supplies furnished or labor or services performed.

(b) A description of the land involved, the name of the debtor, and his interest in the production from the unit area.

(c) The amount which is still due and unpaid.

(d) A statement that at least 20 days prior to the date of the affidavit such person gave written notice to the debtor by registered mail at his last known address, setting forth the information required under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section.

Any such affidavit shall be filed for record not later than 90 days after the delivery of the property or the completion of the labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------

3681.

The lien shall be a first lien on the production and otherwise shall be of the same nature and subject to foreclosure in the same manner and within the same time as mechanics’ liens. In any case where the lien claimant is in possession of the production which is subject to the lien, the supervisor may authorize the lien claimant to sell such production or so much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy such lien, provided that the supervisor shall hold or arrange for the holding of the proceeds of such sale for appropriate distribution upon a determination of the controversy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Regulations [3685. - 3685.]

3685.

Within three months after the effective date of this chapter, the supervisor shall, after one or more public hearings, adopt regulations governing the submittal of proposed unit agreements, modifications thereof, additions thereto, and disagreements with respect to unit operations. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, requirements for filing fees sufficient to cover the costs of administration, and submittal of policies of title insurance. The regulations may be amended from time to time by the supervisor with the approval of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Preemption [3690. - 3690.]

3690.

This chapter shall not be deemed a preemption by the state of any existing right of cities and counties to enact and enforce laws and regulations regulating the conduct and location of oil production activities, including, but not limited to, zoning, fire prevention, public safety, nuisance, appearance, noise, fencing, hours of operation, abandonment, and inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1673.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Geothermal Resources [3700. - 3776.]

3700.

It is hereby found and determined that the people of the State of California have a direct and primary interest in the development of geothermal resources, and that the State of California, through the authority vested in the State Oil and Gas Supervisor, should exercise its power and jurisdiction to require that wells for the discovery and production of geothermal resources be drilled, operated, maintained and abandoned in such manner as to safeguard life, health, property, and the public welfare, and to encourage maximum economic recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.

For the purposes of this chapter, “geothermal resources” shall mean geothermal resources as defined in Section 6903 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3702.

For the purposes of this chapter, “geothermal resources area” means the same general surface area which is underlaid, or reasonably appears to be underlaid, by geothermal resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3703.

“Well” means any well for the discovery of geothermal resources or any well on lands producing geothermal resources or reasonably presumed to contain geothermal resources, or any special well, converted producing well or reactivated or converted abandoned well employed for reinjecting geothermal resources or the residue thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3703.1.

“Low-temperature geothermal resources” are fluids that have value by virtue of the heat contained therein and have a temperature that is not more than the boiling point of water at the altitude of occurrence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3704.

“Department”, in reference to the government of this state, means the Department of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3705.

“Division,” in reference to the government of this state, means the Geologic Energy Management Division in the Department of Conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 16.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3706.

“Director” means the Director of Conservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3707.

“Supervisor” means the State Oil and Gas Supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3708.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, association, corporation, or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3709.

“Operator” means any person drilling, maintaining, operating, pumping, or in control of any well.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3710.

“Owner” includes “operator” when any well is operated or has been operated or is about to be operated by any person other than the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3711.

“Operator” includes “owner” when any well is or has been or is about to be operated by or under the direction of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3712.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to meet its purposes, and the director and the supervisor, acting with the approval of the director, shall have all powers which may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the authority to adopt rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3714.

The State Oil and Gas Supervisor shall so supervise the drilling, operation, maintenance and abandonment of geothermal resources wells as to encourage the greatest ultimate economic recovery of geothermal resources, to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources, and to prevent damage to, and waste from, the underground geothermal deposits, and to prevent damage to underground and surface waters suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes by reason of the drilling, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of geothermal resources wells.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

3714.5.

The supervisor, pursuant to regulation, shall designate geothermal resources areas and may exclude from the operation of this chapter certain wells within such geothermal resources areas when there is no probability of encountering geothermal resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1102.)
-------------------------------------------

3715.

The supervisor shall also supervise the drilling, operation, maintenance, and abandonment of wells so as to permit the owners or operators of such wells to utilize all methods and practices known to the industry for the purpose of increasing the ultimate recovery of geothermal resources and which, in the opinion of the supervisor, are suitable for such purpose in each proposed case. In order to further the elimination of waste by increasing the recovery of geothermal resources it is hereby declared as a policy of this state that the grant in a geothermal resources lease or contract to a lessee or operator of the right or power, in substance, to explore for and remove all
 geothermal resources from any lands in the State of California, in the absence of an express provision to the contrary contained in such lease or contract, is deemed to allow the lessee or contractor or his successors or assigns, to do what a prudent operator using reasonable diligence would do, having in mind the best interest of the lessor, lessee and the state, in producing and removing geothermal resources; provided, however, nothing contained in this section imposes a legal duty upon such lessee or contractor, his successors or assigns, to conduct such operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3715.5.

(a) For the purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (commencing with Section 21000), the division shall be the lead agency as defined in Section 21067 for all geothermal exploratory projects as defined in Section 21065.5.

(b) (1) The division may delegate its lead agency responsibility under this section to a county that has adopted a geothermal element, as defined in Section 25133, for its general plan.

(2) Upon the request of an applicant, the county in which a geothermal exploratory project is located, regardless of whether the county has adopted a geothermal element for its general plan, shall assume responsibilities of a lead agency, as defined in Section 21067, for the project. The applicant shall make the request to the county and the division.

(c) If a county assumes lead agency responsibility pursuant to subdivision (b), the county and the division shall confer regarding necessary information that should be included in the environmental review for the project to facilitate the division’s exercise of its authority as a
 responsible agency, as defined in Section 21069.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to geothermal exploratory projects, as defined in Section
 21065.5, where, before January 1, 1979, preparation of an environmental impact report for
 a geothermal exploratory project has begun or an application for a geothermal exploratory project
 that will require preparation of an environmental impact report has been filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 678, Sec. 1.   (AB 1359)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3716.

The district deputy in each district shall collect all information regarding the wells in the district necessary for the proper supervision of the wells. The district deputy shall prepare maps and other accessories necessary to determine the underground conditions in a geothermal area and the location and extent of strata bearing water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes or surface water suitable for those purposes. This work shall be done with the view to advising the operators as to the best means of protecting the geothermal resource deposits and the water-bearing strata and surface water, and with a view to aiding the supervisor in ordering
 tests or repair work at wells. All the data shall be kept on file in the office of the district deputy of the respective district, and copies thereof shall be available, upon request, to the Director of Water Resources, the State Geologist, and the appropriate California regional water quality control board located in the area involved, subject to Section 3752.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3717.

Upon request, the supervisor shall notify the Department of Fish and Game and the California regional water quality control board in the area affected of the location and abandonment of geothermal wells.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

3718.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as superseding any of the provisions of Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code or Division 6 (commencing with Section 5650) of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3719.

The supervisor shall publish any publications, reports, maps, statistical data or other printed matter relating to geothermal resources, for which there may be public demand. If these publications, reports, maps, statistical data or other printed matter are sold, they shall be sold at cost, and the proceeds shall be deposited in the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 16.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3720.

For the purposes of this chapter, the state may be divided into one or more districts, the boundaries of which shall be fixed by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3721.

Every owner or operator of any well shall designate an agent, giving his or her address, who resides in this state, to receive and accept all orders, notices, and processes of the supervisor or any court of law. Every person so appointing an agent shall, within five days after the termination of the agency, notify the supervisor, in writing, of such termination, and unless operations are discontinued, shall appoint a new agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 278, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3722.

The owner or operator of any well shall notify the supervisor or the district deputy, in writing, in such form as the supervisor or the district deputy may direct, of the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, or exchange by the owner or operator of such well, and the land, owned or leased, upon which the well is located, within 30 days after such sale assignment, transfer, conveyance, or exchange. The notice shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the person to whom such well was sold, assigned, transferred, conveyed, or exchanged.

(b) The name and location of the well.

(c) The date of the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance or exchange.

(d) The date when possession was relinquished by the owner or operator.

(e) A description of the land upon which the well is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

3723.

Every person who acquires the ownership or operation of any well, whether by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or otherwise, shall, within 30 days after acquiring the well and the land, owned or leased, upon which it is located, notify the supervisor or the district deputy, in writing, of his ownership or operation. The notice shall contain the following:

(a) The name and address of the person from whom the well was acquired.

(b) The name and location of the well.

(c) The date of acquisition.

(d) The date when possession was acquired.

(e) A description of the land upon which the well is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

3723.5.

Any person who acquires the ownership or operation of any well or wells, whether by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or otherwise, shall, within 30 days after acquiring the well or wells, file with the supervisor an individual indemnity bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each well acquired, or a blanket indemnity bond in the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for any number of wells acquired. The bond shall be stated in substantially the language set forth in Section 3725.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.

The owner or operator of any well, before commencing the original drilling of a well or the redrilling of an abandoned well, shall file with the supervisor or the district deputy a written notice of intention to commence drilling, accompanied by the prescribed fee. Drilling shall not commence until approval is given by the supervisor or the district deputy. If the supervisor or the district deputy fails to give the owner or operator written response to the notice within 10 working days, such failure shall be considered as an approval of the notice and the notice shall, for the purposes and intents of this chapter, be deemed a written report of the
 supervisor. The notice shall contain the following:

(a) The location and elevation of the floor of the proposed derrick.

(b) The number or other designation by which the well shall be known. Such number or designation shall be subject to the approval of the supervisor.

(c) The owner’s or operator’s estimate of the depths between which production will be attempted.

(d) Such other pertinent data as the supervisor may require.

After the completion of any well, the provisions of this section, other than the requirement of the payment of the fee, shall also apply, as far as may be, to the deepening or redrilling of the well, or any operation involving the plugging of the well, or any operations permanently altering
 in any manner the casing of the well. The number or designation by which any well heretofore drilled has been known, and the number or designation specified for any well in a notice filed as required by this section, shall not be changed without first obtaining a written consent of the supervisor.

As set forth by regulation, the appropriate fee to be filed for the drilling of a new well or the redrilling of an abandoned well, shall be twenty-five dollars ($25), two hundred dollars ($200), five hundred dollars ($500), or one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The fee shall be paid as provided in Section 3724.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.1.

An owner or operator may submit to the supervisor for approval a written program to drill a shallow well or wells for temperature-gradient monitoring purposes. In order to qualify under this section, a program shall contain not more than 25 wells and the maximum total depth of each of these wells shall not exceed 250 feet. Each program submitted for approval shall include:

(a) Well numbers.

(b) Well locations and elevations.

(c) Geologic interpretation of the area
 under investigation, including any known or inferred temperature data.

(d) Such other data as may be required by the supervisor.

The fee required to be filed for the drilling of these shallow wells shall be twenty-five dollars ($25) per well or two hundred dollars ($200) per program, whichever is the lesser.

The fee shall be paid as provided in Section 3724.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.2.

If, after study by the supervisor, it is determined that one or all of the wells proposed pursuant to Section 3724.1 require additional supervision, the supervisor may require that a proposal for such well or wells be submitted in compliance with all the provisions of Section 3724.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.3.

Drilling of program wells, as described in Section 3724.1, shall not commence until approval is given by the supervisor or the district deputy. If the supervisor or the district deputy fails to give the owner or operator written response to the program within 10 working days, such failure shall be considered as an approval of the program and the program shall, for the purposes and intents of this chapter, be deemed a written report of the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.32.

When an operator fails to pay a civil penalty imposed pursuant to Section 3754.5, comply with an order of the supervisor issued pursuant to this chapter, or pay a charge assessed under Section 3724.5, the supervisor may deny approval of the operator’s proposed well operations until the operator pays the civil penalty, complies with the order of the supervisor, or pays the charge assessed under Section 3724.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (SB 571)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.35.

The supervisor may adopt regulations governing intermediate and deep wells drilled for temperature-gradient monitoring purposes. The regulations may specify the content of any written program for the wells drilled for that purpose to be submitted to the supervisor for approval, the amount of the fee, if any, to be filed for each intermediate or deep well drilled or for each program, and any other matter deemed necessary by the supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.4.

The proposal, and all other data submitted as required by Sections 3724.1, 3724.2, and 3724.3, shall be maintained in a confidential status as provided for in Section 3752.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.5.

To provide funds for the supervision of geothermal resource wells, the supervisor shall establish an annual well fee, and penalties for late payment, to be applied on an equal basis to all wells as provided under this section.

The annual well fee shall be imposed upon each producing, service, and idle well that existed at any time during the calendar year preceding the statewide fee-assessment date. However, the annual well fee shall not be imposed on any temperature-gradient or observation well, irrespective of its depth, and any low-temperature well, including any well drilled for the purpose of filling a hot
 water spa or pool intended for human immersion, or any well for which the supervisor has approved suspension.

The annual well fee shall be established so that the sum of the annual well fees plus the estimated sum of those well permit fees provided in Sections 3724 and 3724.1 and pursuant to any regulation adopted under Section 3724.35 are equal to the appropriation for the supervision of geothermal resource wells as provided in the Governor’s Budget. The establishment of the annual well fee shall take into account any budget adjustments for actual expenditures in the current and prior fiscal years. Any budget change proposal for support of the provisions of this chapter shall be submitted by the supervisor to geothermal operators for review and comment. A system for determining the fee and penalties and administering the fee and penalty collection shall be adopted by the supervisor by regulation after public hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1077, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.6.

The permit application fees established in Sections 3724 and 3724.1 shall be made payable by the operator to the Department of Conservation, and the annual well fee established in accordance with Section 3724.5 shall be made payable to the Treasurer. The proceeds from the permit applications and the annual well fees shall be deposited in the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund, and shall be available for appropriation exclusively for the supervision of geothermal resource wells.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 17.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3725.

Every person who engages in the drilling, redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning of any well, except a low-temperature geothermal well, shall file with the supervisor an individual indemnity bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each well drilled, redrilled, deepened, maintained, or abandoned. The bond shall be filed with the supervisor at the time of the filing of the notice of intention to drill, redrill, deepen, maintain, or abandon, as provided in Section 3724 or 3724.1. The bond shall be executed by the person, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, conditioned that the principal named in the
 bond shall faithfully comply with all the provisions of this chapter, in drilling, redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning any well or wells covered by the bond, and shall secure the state against all losses, charges, and expenses incurred by it to obtain such compliance by the principal named in the bond.

The conditions of the bond shall be stated in substantially the following language:

“If ____, the above bounden principal, shall well and truly comply with all the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3700) of Division 3 of the Public Resources Code and shall obey all lawful orders of the State Oil and Gas Supervisor, or his or her district deputy or deputies, if not appealed as provided in that chapter, or upon affirmance thereof by the Director of Conservation, if appealed thereto, and shall pay all charges, costs, and expenses incurred by the supervisor or his or her district deputy or deputies in
 respect of the well or wells or the property or properties of the principal, or assessed against the well or wells or the property or properties of the principal, in pursuance of the provisions of that chapter, then this obligation shall be void; otherwise, it shall remain in full force and effect.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 278, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

3725.5.

Any person who engages in the drilling, redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning of any low-temperature well, as defined in Section 3703.1, shall file with the supervisor an individual indemnity bond in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each well less than 2,000 feet deep, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each well 2,000 feet deep or deeper, but less than 5,000 feet deep, fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each well 5,000 but less than 10,000 feet deep, or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each well 10,000 or more feet deep. The bond shall be filed with the supervisor at the time of the filing of the notice of intention to drill, redrill,
 deepen, maintain, or abandon, as provided in Section 3724 or 3724.1. The bond shall be executed by such person, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and shall be in substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3725, except as to the difference in the amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

3726.

Any person who engages in the drilling, redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning of one or more wells at any time, may file with the supervisor one bond for one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to cover all his operations in drilling, redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning of any of his wells in this state in lieu of an individual indemnity bond for each such operation as required by Section 3725 or 3725.5. The bond shall be executed by such person, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and shall be in substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3725, except as to the difference in the
 amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

3728.

Any individual or blanket indemnity bond issued in compliance with this chapter may, with the consent of the supervisor, be terminated and canceled and the surety be relieved of all obligations thereunder when the well or wells covered by such bond have been properly abandoned or another valid bond has been substituted therefor. Should the person who has filed a blanket bond properly abandon a portion of his wells covered by the bond, the bond may, with the consent of the supervisor, be terminated and canceled and the surety be relieved of all obligations thereunder upon the filing by such person of an individual bond for e ch well which he is still engaged in drilling,
 redrilling, deepening, maintaining, or abandoning. Liability as to individual wells that have been drilled and abandoned under a blanket bond may also be terminated with the consent of the supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

3728.5.

In lieu of the bond required by Sections 3723.5, 3725, 3725.5, and 3726, a deposit may, with the written approval of the supervisor, be given pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 995.710) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, other than a deposit of money or bearer bonds or bearer notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 351.)
-------------------------------------------

3729.

For the purposes of Section 3728, a well is properly abandoned when it has been shown to the satisfaction of the supervisor that all proper steps have been taken to protect underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or farm or domestic purposes from the infiltration or addition of any detrimental substance, and to prevent the escape of all fluids to the surface.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 794.)
-------------------------------------------

3730.

The owner or operator of any well shall keep, or cause to be kept, a careful and accurate log, core record, and history of the drilling of the well.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3731.

The log shall show the character and depth of the formation passed through or encountered in the drilling of the well, the amount, size and weight of casing used, and particularly the location, depth and temperature of waterbearing strata, together with the temperature, chemical composition, and other chemical and physical characteristics of fluid encountered from time to time, so far as ascertained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3732.

The core record shall show the depth, character, and fluid content of cores obtained, so far as determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3733.

The history shall show the location and amount of sidetracked casings, tools, or other material, the depth and quantity of cement in cement plugs, the shots of dynamite or other explosives, the results of production and other tests during drilling operations, and completion data.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1483.)
-------------------------------------------

3734.

The log shall be kept in the local office of the owner or operator and, together with the tour reports of the owner or operator, shall be subject, during business hours, to the inspection of the board, the supervisor, or the district deputy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------

3735.

Upon the completion or abandonment of any well or upon the suspension of operations upon any well, true copies of the log, core record, history, and, if made, true copies of all electrical, physical, or chemical logs, tests, or surveys, in duplicate and in such form as the supervisor may direct, shall be filed with the district deputy within 60 days after such completion or abandonment. Like copies shall be filed upon the recompletion of any well.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3736.

The owner or operator of any well, or his local agent, shall file with the supervisor a copy of the log, history, and core record, or any portion thereof, at any time after the commencement of the work of drilling any well upon written request of the supervisor, or the district deputy. The request shall be signed by the supervisor, or the district deputy, and served either personally, or by mailing a copy of the request, by registered mail, to the last known post office address of the owner or operator, or his agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------

3737.

A well is completed, for the purposes of this chapter, 30 days after it has commenced to produce a geothermal resource unless drilling operations are resumed before the end of the 30-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

3739.

Any person engaged in operating any wells wherein high pressures are known to exist, and any person drilling for geothermal resources in any district where the pressures are unknown shall equip the well with casings of sufficient strength, and with such other safety devices as may be necessary, in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor, and shall use every reasonable effort and endeavor effectually to prevent blowouts, explosions, and fires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1398.)
-------------------------------------------

3740.

The owner or operator of any well on lands producing or reasonably presumed to contain geothermal resources shall properly case it with watertight and adequate casing, in accordance with methods approved by the supervisor or the district deputy. The owner or operator shall also use every reasonable effort and endeavor to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources, to shut out detrimental substances from strata containing water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes and from surface water suitable for such purposes, and to prevent the infiltration of detrimental substances into such strata and into such surface water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

3741.

The supervisor shall require such tests or remedial work as in his judgment are necessary to prevent damage to life, health, property, and natural resources, to protect geothermal resources deposits from damage, or to prevent the infiltration of detrimental substances into underground or surface water suitable for irrigation or domestic purposes, to the best interests of the neighboring property owners and the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

3742.2.

Any person having drilled a well or wells on state, federal or private lands which are producing or, according to the supervisor, are capable of producing geothermal resources, may, at any time, apply to the supervisor for a certificate of primary purpose. When the supervisor determines that such well or wells are primarily for the purpose of producing geothermal resources and not for the purpose of producing water usable for domestic and irrigation purposes, the supervisor shall issue a certificate of primary purpose to such person. Such certificate shall establish a rebuttable presumption that such person has absolute title to the geothermal resources